Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.145

Property donations—Credit against assessments.

The county legislative authority may give credit for all or any portion of any property donation against an assessment, charge, or other required financial contribution for transportation improvements within a county road improvement district. The credit granted is available against any assessment, charge, or other required financial contribution for any transportation purpose that uses the donated property.

[ 1987 c 267 s 11.]

NOTES:

Right-of-way donations: Chapter 47.14 RCW.